Georgia statutes. TITLE 28 General Assembly
CHAPTER 10 Georgia Rail Passenger Authority Overview Committee

Cross references.

Construction and operation of rail passenger service projects by Georgia Rail Passenger Authority, §

46-9-270

et seq.

Code Commission notes.

Code sections comprising a new Chapter 9 of this title were added by Ga. L. 1985, p. 197, § 1 (§§

28-9-1

through

28-9-4

), Ga. L. 1985, p. 202, § 1 (§

28-9-5

), and Ga. L. 1985, p. 1283, § 2 (§§

28-9-1

through 28-9-7). Pursuant to Code Section

28-9-5

, in 1985, the chapter enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1283, § 2 was redesignated Chapter 10, and the Code sections enacted by that Act were redesignated Code Sections

28-10-1

through

28-10-7

.

28-10-1.
Creation of the Georgia Rail Passenger Authority Overview Committee; membership; term of office; officers.

The Georgia Rail Passenger Authority Overview Committee is created. The committee shall consist of five members of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the House and five members of the Senate appointed by the President of the Senate. The members shall serve for terms as members of the committee concurrent with their terms of office as members of the General Assembly. Members of the committee shall be appointed during the first 30 days of each regular legislative session which is held immediately following the election of members of the General Assembly; provided, however, that an appointment to fill any vacancy on the committee may be made at any time.

The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall designate one of the members appointed by the Speaker as chairman of the committee. The President of the Senate shall designate one of the members appointed by the President of the Senate as vice-chairman of the committee. The members designated as chairman and vice-chairman shall serve for terms as such officers concurrent with their terms as members of the committee. Other than the chairman and vice-chairman provided for in this subsection, the committee shall provide for its own organization.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-10-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1283, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1180, § 1.

28-10-2.
Duties of committee.

The committee shall periodically inquire into and review the operations, contracts, safety, financing, organization, and structure of the Georgia Rail Passenger Authority, as well as periodically review and evaluate the success with which said authority is accomplishing its legislatively created purposes.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-10-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1283, § 2.

28-10-3.
Availability of services of state auditor and Attorney General; committee employees; employment of professional services.

The state auditor and the Attorney General shall make available to the committee the services of their staff, facilities, and powers in order to assist the committee in the discharge of its duties. The committee may employ staff and secure the services of independent accountants, engineers, and consultants, provided that both the employment and the amount of compensation to be received by such personnel is authorized by a joint resolution of the General Assembly. Upon authorization by joint resolution of the General Assembly, the committee shall have the power to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents in aid of its duties.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-10-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1283, § 2.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1985, in the first sentence “their” was substituted for “its”.

28-10-4.
Cooperation of Georgia Rail Passenger Authority; committee reports.

The Georgia Rail Passenger Authority shall cooperate with the committee, its authorized personnel, the Attorney General, the state accounting officer, and the state auditor in order that the committee may efficiently and effectively carry out its duties. The Georgia Rail Passenger Authority shall submit to the committee such reports and data as the committee shall reasonably require of said authority in order that the committee may adequately inform itself of the activities of said authority. The committee shall, on or before the first day of January of each year, and at such other times as it deems to be in the public interest, submit to the General Assembly a report of its findings and recommendations based upon the review of the operations of the Georgia Rail Passenger Authority.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-10-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1283, § 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 694, § 31/HB 293.

28-10-5.
Criteria for committee evaluation of Georgia Rail Passenger Authority.

In the discharge of its duties, the committee shall evaluate the performance of the Georgia Rail Passenger Authority in providing rail passenger service consistent with the following criteria:

Public safety;

Prudent, legal, and accountable expenditure of public funds;

Responsiveness to the needs for rail passenger services;

Economic vitality of the rail passenger system and economic benefits to the state;

Efficient operation; and

Impact on the environment.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-10-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1283, § 2.

28-10-6.
Expenses and allowances for committee members.

The members of the committee shall receive the same expenses and allowances for their services on the committee as are authorized by law for members of interim legislative study committees.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-10-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1283, § 2.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, “are” was substituted for “is”.

28-10-7.
Effect of chapter on responsibilities of the Georgia Rail Passenger Authority.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to relieve the Georgia Rail Passenger Authority of the responsibilities imposed upon it under Article 9 of Chapter 9 of Title 46.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-10-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 1283, § 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 28.